Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 38 Long-Term Care Insurance

Purpose of chapter. —

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 2, provides: “The purpose of this chapter is to promote the public interest, to promote the availability of long-term care insurance policies, to protect applicants for long-term care insurance from unfair or deceptive sales or enrollment practices, to establish standards for long-term care insurance, to facilitate public understanding and comparison of long-term care insurance policies and to facilitate flexibility and innovation in the development of long-term care insurance coverage.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 21, 22.